Utah statutes.
63M-1-1404.   Powers and duties of office related to tourism development
plan -- Annual report and survey.
(1)  The office shall:
(a)  be the tourism development authority of the state;
(b)  develop a tourism advertising, marketing, and branding program for the
state;
(c)  receive approval from the Board of Tourism Development under Subsection
63M-1-1403(1)(a) before implementing the out-of-state advertising, marketing,
and branding campaign;
(d)  develop a plan to increase the economic contribution by tourists visiting
the state;
(e)  plan and conduct a program of information, advertising, and publicity
relating to the recreational, scenic, historic, and tourist advantages and
attractions of the state at large; and
(f)  encourage and assist in the coordination of the activities of persons,
firms, associations, corporations, travel regions, counties, and governmental
agencies engaged in publicizing, developing, and promoting the scenic
attractions and tourist advantages of the state.
(2)  Any plan provided for under Subsection (1) shall address, but not be
limited to, enhancing the state's image, promoting Utah as a year-round
destination, encouraging expenditures by visitors to the state, and expanding
the markets where the state is promoted.
(3)  The office shall conduct a regular and ongoing research program to
identify statewide economic trends and conditions in the tourism sector of the
economy and to provide an annual evaluation of the economic efficiency of the
advertising and branding campaigns conducted under this part to the
Legislature's Workforce Services and Community and Economic Development
Interim Committee and the Economic Development and Human Resources
Appropriations Subcommittee.
